Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB996.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8133(c)(2) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed AMENDED TO READ:§ 8133. Basic life support ambulances.* * *(c) Exceptions.--* * *[(2) This subsection shall expire April 29, [2027] 2032.]Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.<--<--<--1234567891011121314